Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/fr_Supplemental.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1486 N 1
SFX 1486 0 p .

SFX 1487 N 1
SFX 1487 0 pa .

SFX 1488 N 1
SFX 1488 0 paca .

SFX 1489 N 1
SFX 1489 0 pada .

SFX 1490 N 1
SFX 1490 0 pagne .

SFX 1491 N 1
SFX 1491 0 paign .

SFX 1492 N 1
SFX 1492 0 paillat .

SFX 1493 N 1
SFX 1493 0 pan .

SFX 1494 N 1
SFX 1494 0 pang .

SFX 1495 N 1
SFX 1495 0 pania .

SFX 1496 N 1
SFX 1496 0 panie .

SFX 1497 N 1
SFX 1497 0 parta .

SFX 1498 N 1
SFX 1498 0 passak .

SFX 1499 N 1
SFX 1499 0 pazarı .

SFX 1500 N 1
SFX 1500 0 pbell .

SFX 1501 N 1
SFX 1501 0 pdani .

SFX 1502 N 1
SFX 1502 0 peche .

SFX 1503 N 1
SFX 1503 0 pellier .

SFX 1504 N 1
SFX 1504 0 pendence .

SFX 1505 N 1
SFX 1505 0 pendencia .

SFX 1506 N 1
SFX 1506 0 phalie .

SFX 1507 N 1
SFX 1507 0 phi .

SFX 1508 N 1
SFX 1508 0 pienga .

SFX 1509 N 1
SFX 1509 0 pina .

SFX 1510 N 1
SFX 1510 0 pinang .

SFX 1511 N 1
SFX 1511 0 pinas .

SFX 1512 N 1
SFX 1512 0 pines .

SFX 1513 N 1
SFX 1513 0 ping .

SFX 1514 N 1
SFX 1514 0 pírito .

SFX 1515 N 1
SFX 1515 0 pkins .

SFX 1516 N 1
SFX 1516 0 po .

SFX 1517 N 1
SFX 1517 0 poo .

SFX 1518 N 1
SFX 1518 0 pool .

SFX 1519 N 1
SFX 1519 0 port .

SFX 1520 N 1
SFX 1520 0 pos .

SFX 1521 N 1
SFX 1521 0 ppertal .

SFX 1522 N 1
SFX 1522 0 prise .

SFX 1523 N 1
SFX 1523 0 pur .

SFX 1524 N 1
SFX 1524 0 py .

SFX 1525 N 1
SFX 1525 0 qing .

SFX 1526 N 1
SFX 1526 0 quan .

SFX 1527 N 1
SFX 1527 0 quebradas .

SFX 1528 N 1
SFX 1528 0 quén .

SFX 1529 N 1
SFX 1529 0 quotank .

SFX 1530 N 1
SFX 1530 0 r .

SFX 1531 N 1
SFX 1531 0 ra .

SFX 1532 N 1
SFX 1532 0 rabad .

SFX 1533 N 1
SFX 1533 0 râbâd .

SFX 1534 N 1
SFX 1534 0 racuy .

SFX 1535 N 1
SFX 1535 0 rășeni .

SFX 1536 N 1
SFX 1536 0 rafford .

SFX 1537 N 1
SFX 1537 0 râh .

SFX 1538 N 1
SFX 1538 0 rail .

SFX 1539 N 1
SFX 1539 0 rak .

SFX 1540 N 1
SFX 1540 0 ran .

SFX 1541 N 1
SFX 1541 0 ranah .

SFX 1542 N 1
SFX 1542 0 rangābād .

SFX 1543 N 1
SFX 1543 0 rasbourg .

SFX 1544 N 1
SFX 1544 0 raubing .

SFX 1545 N 1
SFX 1545 0 rcy .

SFX 1546 N 1
SFX 1546 0 rdımlı .

SFX 1547 N 1
SFX 1547 0 re .

SFX 1548 N 1
SFX 1548 0 réal .

SFX 1549 N 1
SFX 1549 0 rebourg .

SFX 1550 N 1
SFX 1550 0 rebruck .

SFX 1551 N 1
SFX 1551 0 regard .

SFX 1552 N 1
SFX 1552 0 rell .

SFX 1553 N 1
SFX 1553 0 relouis .

SFX 1554 N 1
SFX 1554 0 ren .

SFX 1555 N 1
SFX 1555 0 renas .

SFX 1556 N 1
SFX 1556 0 reuil .

SFX 1557 N 1
SFX 1557 0 reuth .

SFX 1558 N 1
SFX 1558 0 reville .

SFX 1559 N 1
SFX 1559 0 rey .

SFX 1560 N 1
SFX 1560 0 reymoy .

SFX 1561 N 1
SFX 1561 0 rgo .

SFX 1562 N 1
SFX 1562 0 ria .

SFX 1563 N 1
SFX 1563 0 ribault .

SFX 1564 N 1
SFX 1564 0 rice .

SFX 1565 N 1
SFX 1565 0 rich .

SFX 1566 N 1
SFX 1566 0 ridabad .

SFX 1567 N 1
SFX 1567 0 rie .

SFX 1568 N 1
SFX 1568 0 rif .

SFX 1569 N 1
SFX 1569 0 rio .

SFX 1570 N 1
SFX 1570 0 ritanie .

SFX 1571 N 1
SFX 1571 0 rkee .

SFX 1572 N 1
SFX 1572 0 rkey .

SFX 1573 N 1
SFX 1573 0 rlem .

SFX 1574 N 1
SFX 1574 0 rlemmermeer .

SFX 1575 N 1
SFX 1575 0 rmasin .

SFX 1576 N 1
SFX 1576 0 rnador .

SFX 1577 N 1
SFX 1577 0 rnas .

SFX 1578 N 1
SFX 1578 0 rne .

SFX 1579 N 1
SFX 1579 0 rnton .

SFX 1580 N 1
SFX 1580 0 ro .

SFX 1581 N 1
SFX 1581 0 rora .

SFX 1582 N 1
SFX 1582 0 rose .

SFX 1583 N 1
SFX 1583 0 rossiisk .

SFX 1584 N 1
SFX 1584 0 rouïsk .

SFX 1585 N 1
SFX 1585 0 rovica .

SFX 1586 N 1
SFX 1586 0 rp .

SFX 1587 N 1
SFX 1587 0 rpool .

SFX 1588 N 1
SFX 1588 0 rqia .

SFX 1589 N 1
SFX 1589 0 rrington .

SFX 1590 N 1
SFX 1590 0 rrukhabad .

SFX 1591 N 1
SFX 1591 0 rs .

SFX 1592 N 1
SFX 1592 0 rtemberg .

SFX 1593 N 1
SFX 1593 0 rtzbourg .

SFX 1594 N 1
SFX 1594 0 ru .

SFX 1595 N 1
SFX 1595 0 ruff .

SFX 1596 N 1
SFX 1596 0 ruoka .

SFX 1597 N 1
SFX 1597 0 rur .

SFX 1598 N 1
SFX 1598 0 ry .

SFX 1599 N 1
SFX 1599 0 s .

SFX 1600 N 1
SFX 1600 0 sa .

SFX 1601 N 1
SFX 1601 0 saic .

SFX 1602 N 1
SFX 1602 0 saki .

SFX 1603 N 1
SFX 1603 0 sal .

SFX 1604 N 1
SFX 1604 0 san .

SFX 1605 N 1
SFX 1605 0 sap .

SFX 1606 N 1
SFX 1606 0 sau .

SFX 1607 N 1
SFX 1607 0 saviourt .

SFX 1608 N 1
SFX 1608 0 sbach .

SFX 1609 N 1
SFX 1609 0 sboro .

SFX 1610 N 1
SFX 1610 0 sborough .

SFX 1611 N 1
SFX 1611 0 sbrough .

SFX 1612 N 1
SFX 1612 0 sbruck .

SFX 1613 N 1
SFX 1613 0 sburg .

SFX 1614 N 1
SFX 1614 0 sburgh .

SFX 1615 N 1
SFX 1615 0 sbury .

SFX 1616 N 1
SFX 1616 0 schede .

SFX 1617 N 1
SFX 1617 0 sdale .

SFX 1618 N 1
SFX 1618 0 se .

SFX 1619 N 1
SFX 1619 0 selweni .

SFX 1620 N 1
SFX 1620 0 sen .

SFX 1621 N 1
SFX 1621 0 senada .

SFX 1622 N 1
SFX 1622 0 sequibo .

SFX 1623 N 1
SFX 1623 0 seri .

SFX 1624 N 1
SFX 1624 0 serrado .

SFX 1625 N 1
SFX 1625 0 serrat .

SFX 1626 N 1
SFX 1626 0 ševac .

SFX 1627 N 1
SFX 1627 0 sevelt .

SFX 1628 N 1
SFX 1628 0 sex .

SFX 1629 N 1
SFX 1629 0 sfield .

SFX 1630 N 1
SFX 1630 0 shah .

SFX 1631 N 1
SFX 1631 0 shara .

SFX 1632 N 1
SFX 1632 0 shi .

SFX 1633 N 1
SFX 1633 0 shou .

SFX 1634 N 1
SFX 1634 0 shui .

SFX 1635 N 1
SFX 1635 0 si .

SFX 1636 N 1
SFX 1636 0 side .

SFX 1637 N 1
SFX 1637 0 siung .

SFX 1638 N 1
SFX 1638 0 sk .

SFX 1639 N 1
SFX 1639 0 skala .

SFX 1640 N 1
SFX 1640 0 ski .

SFX 1641 N 1
SFX 1641 0 sland .

SFX 1642 N 1
SFX 1642 0 slingen .

SFX 1643 N 1
SFX 1643 0 smouth .

SFX 1644 N 1
SFX 1644 0 sna .

SFX 1645 N 1
SFX 1645 0 so .

SFX 1646 N 1
SFX 1646 0 sol .

SFX 1647 N 1
SFX 1647 0 somolsk .

SFX 1648 N 1
SFX 1648 0 son .

SFX 1649 N 1
SFX 1649 0 sonate .

SFX 1650 N 1
SFX 1650 0 sonville .

SFX 1651 N 1
SFX 1651 0 soré .

SFX 1652 N 1
SFX 1652 0 sorol .

SFX 1653 N 1
SFX 1653 0 sothon .

SFX 1654 N 1
SFX 1654 0 spils .

SFX 1655 N 1
SFX 1655 0 spur .

SFX 1656 N 1
SFX 1656 0 ss .

SFX 1657 N 1
SFX 1657 0 ssa .

SFX 1658 N 1
SFX 1658 0 ssalie .

SFX 1659 N 1
SFX 1659 0 ssalonique .

SFX 1660 N 1
SFX 1660 0 ssibirsk .

SFX 1661 N 1
SFX 1661 0 ssig .

SFX 1662 N 1
SFX 1662 0 ssol .

SFX 1663 N 1
SFX 1663 0 st .

SFX 1664 N 1
SFX 1664 0 sta .

SFX 1665 N 1
SFX 1665 0 stadt .

SFX 1666 N 1
SFX 1666 0 stan .

SFX 1667 N 1
SFX 1667 0 ster .

SFX 1668 N 1
SFX 1668 0 stin .

SFX 1669 N 1
SFX 1669 0 ston .

SFX 1670 N 1
SFX 1670 0 stown .

SFX 1671 N 1
SFX 1671 0 stpils .

SFX 1672 N 1
SFX 1672 0 stralie .

SFX 1673 N 1
SFX 1673 0 strasse .

SFX 1674 N 1
SFX 1674 0 su .

SFX 1675 N 1
SFX 1675 0 suj .

SFX 1676 N 1
SFX 1676 0 sukaichi .

SFX 1677 N 1
SFX 1677 0 sümber .

SFX 1678 N 1
SFX 1678 0 sville .

SFX 1679 N 1
SFX 1679 0 sylvania .

SFX 1680 N 1
SFX 1680 0 t .

SFX 1681 N 1
SFX 1681 0 ta .

SFX 1682 N 1
SFX 1682 0 taa .

SFX 1683 N 1
SFX 1683 0 tabula .

SFX 1684 N 1
SFX 1684 0 tan .

SFX 1685 N 1
SFX 1685 0 tanbeyli .

SFX 1686 N 1
SFX 1686 0 tang .

SFX 1687 N 1
SFX 1687 0 tão .

SFX 1688 N 1
SFX 1688 0 tave .

SFX 1689 N 1
SFX 1689 0 taza .

SFX 1690 N 1
SFX 1690 0 tch .

SFX 1691 N 1
SFX 1691 0 tchaïévo .

SFX 1692 N 1
SFX 1692 0 tché .

SFX 1693 N 1
SFX 1693 0 tcheboksarsk .

SFX 1694 N 1
SFX 1694 0 tcherkassk .

SFX 1695 N 1
SFX 1695 0 īte .

SFX 1696 N 1
SFX 1696 0 te .

SFX 1697 N 1
SFX 1697 0 telí .

SFX 1698 N 1
SFX 1698 0 telmark .

SFX 1699 N 1
SFX 1699 0 tenga .

SFX 1700 N 1
SFX 1700 0 tero .

SFX 1701 N 1
SFX 1701 0 terprise .

SFX 1702 N 1
SFX 1702 0 terre .

SFX 1703 N 1
SFX 1703 0 tes .

SFX 1704 N 1
SFX 1704 0 the .

SFX 1705 N 1
SFX 1705 0 thorpe .

SFX 1706 N 1
SFX 1706 0 ști .

SFX 1707 N 1
SFX 1707 0 till .

SFX 1708 N 1
SFX 1708 0 titas .

SFX 1709 N 1
SFX 1709 0 to .

SFX 1710 N 1
SFX 1710 0 ton .

SFX 1711 N 1
SFX 1711 0 tonie .

SFX 1712 N 1
SFX 1712 0 town .

SFX 1713 N 1
SFX 1713 0 trami .

SFX 1714 N 1
SFX 1714 0 tre .

SFX 1715 N 1
SFX 1715 0 trémadure .

SFX 1716 N 1
SFX 1716 0 troïtsk .

SFX 1717 N 1
SFX 1717 0 tson .

SFX 1718 N 1
SFX 1718 0 tsu .

SFX 1719 N 1
SFX 1719 0 tsushiro .

SFX 1720 N 1
SFX 1720 0 ttle .

SFX 1721 N 1
SFX 1721 0 tu .

SFX 1722 N 1
SFX 1722 0 tuaire .

SFX 1723 N 1
SFX 1723 0 tuwa .

SFX 1724 N 1
SFX 1724 0 u .

SFX 1725 N 1
SFX 1725 0 ua .

SFX 1726 N 1
SFX 1726 0 uatu .

SFX 1727 N 1
SFX 1727 0 uay .

SFX 1728 N 1
SFX 1728 0 ucky .

SFX 1729 N 1
SFX 1729 0 uco .
