Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/fr_Supplemental.dic
Andrew/1599
Arroyo/1599
Asan/1646
Bahama/1599
Baker/1629
Bande/1531
Banja/1575
Bank/1599,1746
Barcelone/1681
Basse/1599,1702
Bila/1655
Borgo/1724
Brown/1678
Buena/1599,1764
Burnet/1680
Cagua/1599
Caïman/1599
Carroll/1710
Castle/1712
Charles/1710,1712
Charlotte/1678
Claro/1599
Clay/1710
Comore/1599
Cova/1644
Cuba/1687
David/1648
Davie/1656
Dhaal/1724
Domingo/1599
Dos/1527,1645
État/1599
fédérale/1599
Frederick/1613
George/1712
Gove/1576
Govi/1677
Gray/1599,1648
Gros/1599,1600,1645
Haye/1599
Hyde/1530,1532,1533
Inde/1504,1505,1599
Inn/1612
Isle/1680
Jabal/1523
Jack/1648,1650
John/1599,1648,1669
Kaoh/1637
Kerman/1630
Kota/1530,1811
Lanka/1540
Lika/1635
Lima/1662
Live/1587
Love/1690
Marsa/1639,1797
Mateo/1599
Médine/1680
Middle/1611,1628
Midland/1599
Mie/1608
Mille/1530
Mingo/1531
Mount/1538
Nichola/1599
Noble/1599
Ogle/1705
Oural/1640
Page/1680
Parme/1530
Pérou/1618
Petite/1599
Philip/1512
Pitt/1613,1614,1679
Preto/1562
Prince/1599,1600
Punta/1555
Queen/1599,1641,1670
Région/1599
Rhode/1599
Rif/1680
Rivière/1599
Roche/1667
Roger/1599
Rome/1580
Rosa/1569
Rum/1507
Sandy/1599
Sanma/1699
Scott/1599,1617
Sea/1545,1720
Sous/1599,1618
Swain/1599
Tanjung/1510
Territoire/1599
The/1658,1659
Torba/1680
Vega/1599
Vent/1654,1746
Vila/1599
Wayne/1609
White/1636
Wilkin/1648
Wyandot/1696
